lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/germanManualCase.aff
# no CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE

# compound flags

COMPOUNDBEGIN U
COMPOUNDMIDDLE V
COMPOUNDEND W

ONLYINCOMPOUND X
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG P

COMPOUNDMIN 1
WORDCHARS -

# dash prefix for compounds with dash (Arbeits-Computer)

PFX - Y 1
PFX - 0 -/P .

# decapitalizing prefix

PFX D Y 29
PFX D A a/PX A
PFX D � �/PX �
PFX D B b/PX B
PFX D C c/PX C
PFX D D d/PX D
PFX D E e/PX E
PFX D F f/PX F
PFX D G g/PX G
PFX D H h/PX H
PFX D I i/PX I
PFX D J j/PX J
PFX D K k/PX K
PFX D L l/PX L
PFX D M m/PX M
PFX D N n/PX N
PFX D O o/PX O
PFX D � �/PX �
PFX D P p/PX P
PFX D Q q/PX Q
PFX D R r/PX R
PFX D S s/PX S
PFX D T t/PX T
PFX D U u/PX U
PFX D � �/PX �
PFX D V v/PX V
PFX D W w/PX W
PFX D X x/PX X
PFX D Y y/PX Y
PFX D Z z/PX Z
